Massachusetts, session 194th, H4908.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Suffolk county sheriff’s
office shall establish a sick leave bank for William Blalock, an employee of the office. Any
employee of the office may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to
the sick leave bank for use by William Blalock. If William Blalock terminates employment with
the office or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank
shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave
bank as determined by the office.
of 1